Utah statutes.
78A-2-226.   Repeated application for orders forbidden -- Disobedience -- Contempt.

(1)  If an application for an order, made to a judge of a court in which the action or proceeding is pending, is refused in whole or in part or is granted conditionally, a subsequent application for the same order may not be made to any other judge, except of a higher court.

(2)  This section does not apply to motions refused for any informality in the papers or proceedings necessary to obtain the order, or to motions refused with liberty to renew them.

(3)  A notice of appeal for a trial de novo is not a subsequent application for the same order.

(4)  A violation of Subsection (1) may be punished by contempt and any subsequent order may be revoked by the issuing judge or vacated by a judge of the court in which the action or proceeding is pending.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

